Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-238
Act, how cited.

Sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502 may be cited as the Revised Airports Act.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 18, p. 170.

Scope and manner of citation of act is set out. Brasier v. Cribbett, 166 Neb. 145, 88 N.W.2d 235 (1958).